C. THE GOVERNMENT AND PUBLIC ADMINISTRATION 

5. Please provide a description of the structure and functioning of the Government. Government of the Republic of Macedonia  A fundamental value of the Constitutional order of the Republic of Macedonia is the separation  of the state powers into legislative, executive and judicial. Pursuant to Article 88 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 52/91, 1/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03), executive power is vested in the Government, which exercises its rights and duties on the basis and within the framework of the Constitution and law. The Law on the Government adopted in 2000 (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 59/00 and 12/03), determines the organisation and work of the Government. In accordance with this Law the Government adopted the Rules of Procedure of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 38/01, 98/02, 9/03, 47/03, 64/03 and 67/03), which specifically determine its internal organisation, manner of operation and other issues relevant to the functioning of the Government. The President of the Republic of Macedonia nominates the mandatary to constitute the Government and is obliged, within 10 days of the constitution of the Assembly, to entrust the mandate for constituting the Government to a candidate from the party or parties which has/have a majority in the Assembly. Within 20 days from the day of being entrusted with the mandate, the mandatary submits a programme to the Assembly and proposes the composition of the Government. The Government is elected by the Assembly on the proposal of the mandatary and on the basis of the programme by a majority vote of the total number of the Representatives of the Assembly. The Government assumes its power on the day of being elected by the Assembly.  The Government is composed of a Prime Minister and Ministers. The present Government of the Republic of Macedonia is a coalition government and comprises the Social Democratic Union of Macedonia (SDSM), the Liberal–Democratic Party (LDP) and the Democratic Union for Integration (DUI). It is composed of a Prime Minister and 17 members, of which 14 are ministers in charge of ministries, and 4 are ministers without portfolio. According to the Law on the Government, the Prime Minister designates deputy prime ministers. The current composition of the Government is the following:   Dr. Vlado Bukovski, Prime Minister;    Radmila Šekerinska, Deputy Prime Minister in charge of the European Integration and Coordination of Foreign Aid, Minister without portfolio;   Musa Xhaferri, Deputy Prime Minister in charge of implementation of the Framework Agreement, Minister without portfolio;  Mino Jordanov, Deputy Prime Minister in charge of coordinating activities regarding the economic system, Minister without portfolio;   Jovan Manasijevski, Deputy Prime Minister in charge of coordinating activities with regard to the political system and  Minister of Defence   Ljubomir Mihajlovski, Minister of the Interior;   Meri Mladenovska-Gjorgievska, Minister of Justice;   Dr. Ilinka Mitreva, Minister of Foreign Affairs;   M.Sc. Nikola Popovski, Minister of Finance;   M.Sc. Fatmir Besimi, Minister of Economy;   Sadulla Duraku, Minister of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Economy;   Dr. Vladimir Dimov, Minister of Health;   Aziz Polozhani, Minister of Education and Science;  Stevo Jakimovski, Minister of Labour and Social Policy;   Rizvan Sulejmani, Minister of Local Self-Government;   Blagoj Stefanovski, Minister of Culture;   Xhemail Mehazi, Minister of Transport and Communication;   M.Sc. Zoran Šapuri, Minister of Environment and Physical Planning.   Vlado Popovski, Minister without Portfolio. The Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia elected 14 deputy ministers. The Prime Minister and the ministers may not be Representatives in the Assembly. They are granted immunity and the Government decides on their immunity. A Government member may not be detained without the Government’s approval nor may he/she be indicted if he/she claims immunity unless he/she have been found in committing a criminal offence to imprisonment of at least five years.   The Government and each of its members are accountable for their work to the Assembly. The Assembly may vote on a motion of confidence in the Government (for more details see I_B_2).  The Government itself has the right to raise the issue of confidence before the Assembly and has the right to submit its resignation. The resignation of the Government and the Prime Minister is tendered to the President of the Assembly in writing and may be explicated. A resignation of a Government member is submitted to the President of the Assembly through the Prime Minister. The resignation of the Prime Minister, his/her death or permanent inability to perform his/her duties entails resignation of the Government. The Government ceases its term of office when the Assembly is dissolved. A member of the Government has the right to submit his/her resignation. The Prime Minister may propose the dismissal of a member of the Government. The Assembly decides on the proposal for the dismissal of a member of the Government at its first sitting following the proposal. If the Prime Minister proposes dismissal of more than one-third of the initial composition of the Government, the Assembly follows the same procedure as for the election of a new Government. When a vote of no-confidence in the Government has been passed; when the government has tendered a resignation or when its mandate has ceased due to the Assembly’s dissolution, it shall act until the election of a new Government. Competence of the Government According to the Constitution, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia: determines the policy of executing laws and other regulations passed by the Assembly; proposes laws, the budget of the Republic and other regulations to be adopted by the Assembly; proposes the spatial plan of the Republic; proposes decisions concerning the reserves of the Republic and sees to their execution; adopts by-laws and other acts for the execution of laws; determines the principles on the internal organisation and work of the Ministries and other administrative bodies, directs and supervises their work; provides opinions on draft-laws and other acts submitted to the Assembly by other authorised proposers; decides on the recognition of states and governments; establishes diplomatic and consular relations with other states; makes decisions on opening diplomatic and consular offices abroad; proposes the appointment of ambassadors and representatives of the Republic of Macedonia abroad and appoints heads of consular offices; proposes the Public Prosecutor; appoints and dismisses holders of public and other office determined by the Constitution and law; and performs other duties as prescribed by the Constitution and law. Furthermore, the Government signs international agreements when determined by law; gives proposals to the Assembly regarding the state’s accession into a union or community with other states or accession to and disassociation from international organisations; proposes amendments to the Constitution; and proposes a state of war or emergency to the Assembly. In line with the Law on the Government, the Government determines the economic and development policies of the state, determines measures for their realisation and proposes measures on implementation of policies in Assembly's competence. In addition, the Government: determines the development and economic policies; determines action programmes in the area of defence and security and sees to their implementation; undertakes measures on realisation of freedom of the market and entrepreneurship, as well as measures against the monopoly positions in the market; encourages the economic development and promotes a more balanced spatial and regional development and more rapid development of economically underdeveloped areas; determines a strategy for attracting foreign investments; decides on disposing and use of state capital in accordance with law; encourages and assists the scientific and technological development; determines strategies and undertakes measures for integration in European and Euro-Atlantic institutions and other international bodies; monitors and analyses situations regarding the exercise and promotion of human rights and civil freedoms; encourages the development of civil society institutions; undertakes measures on creating conditions for the exercise of the rights to education, healthcare, social insurance and development of human resources; undertakes measures on creating conditions for social protection and safety of citizens; and carries out other duties determined by law. The Government adopts an Annual Work Programme, which presents an operationalisation of the Programme proposed by the Mandatry upon election of the Government. The Government incorporates the strategic priorities and fiscal policies both in the Programme and the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia. The Annual Programme also includes other priorities which have been planned by the ministries for the following year and which are submitted to the Government in the exercise of its competencies as prescribed by the Constitution and law. The Government of the Republic of Macedonia disposes of funds used by agencies on behalf of the Republic of Macedonia. The Government also decides on procuring real estate. The contracts for such procurements are signed by the Minister of Finance. Functioning of the Government The Prime Minister represents the Government and directs its work; convenes and chairs Government's sessions; signs regulations and acts adopted by the Government and sees to their execution; guides the Government’s overall activities and the activities of its members in accordance with the programme commitments of the Government, the guidelines it determines, the strategic priorities, and policy analysis; cooperates with other state bodies, public enterprises, public institutions and public services of common interest; cooperates with companies, political parties, associations of citizens and foundations and other legal persons regarding issues of common interest; cooperates with Prime Ministers and representatives of Governments of other states and with representatives of international bodies and organisations; undertakes measures in the event of non-execution of Government’s decisions; sees to prepare and execute the Annual Work Programme of the Government; decides on holding meetings and consultations regarding issues in its competence; informs the President of the Republic of Macedonia on issues of implementing policies on execution of laws and other regulations of the Assembly; undertakes patronages regarding celebrations and events of importance to the Republic of Macedonia; gives authorisation in regard to the exercise of his/her rights and duties in accordance with law and rules of procedure. The Prime Minister establishes an office providing him/her support, which is managed by a Head of Office appointed and dismissed by the Prime Minister. The Prime Minister also carries out other duties in accordance with the Constitution and the Rules of Procedure. One of the deputy prime ministers designated by the Prime Minister deputises for him/her. The deputy prime ministers perform duties within the Government's competence regarding particular issues for which they have been authorised by the Prime Minister. They report to the Prime Minister concerning the exercise of these duties.  With the aim of establishing opinions and positions on issues related to security, defence and foreign policy, the Prime Minister may organise a consultation with deputy prime ministers and ministers with the relevant portfolios. Consequently, the Government decides on the issues discussed in such composition at its session.  Members of the Government have a right and duty to: attend sessions and participate in Government's work; propose discussion on issues in Government’s competence; participate in discussions and decision-making on issues discussed on a Government’s session; give initiatives for drafting laws and other regulations that the Government is authorised to propose, for regulations and acts adopted by the Government and for establishing guidelines and positions; give initiatives for adopting decisions in Government's competence. Furthermore, the Members of the Government: are obliged to provide assessment on fiscal implications on all proposals they prepare and submit to the Government; actively participate in developing policies, and specifically in preparing and harmonising documents; propose to the Government principle positions and guidelines for the work of state administrative bodies. The Members of the Government participate in the work of working bodies of the Government as their members. They also may participate in the working bodies of which they are not members, and present opinions and suggestions on issues within their terms of reference.  The Government has a Secretary General, who is appointed and dismissed by the Government. The Secretary General, in accordance with the Prime Minister's instructions, carries out duties related to the organisation and preparation of sessions of the Government and its working bodies, as well as other duties for the Government. He/she is accountable to the Government for his/her work. Regarding the General Secretariat as a professional service, the Secretary General has the rights and duties of a Director heading an independent state administrative body. The Secretary General has a Deputy appointed and dismissed by the Government, who is accountable to the Government and the Secretary General. The Government may work and make decisions if more than half of its members attend the session. The Prime Minister convenes the sessions upon his/her initiative or upon the request of at least one third of Government members. (The Government session are currently convened by the Prime Minister every Monday). The Prime Minister may also convene a session upon the request of ministers of one of the coalition partners in the Government. The Government makes decisions at its sessions with majority vote of the Government members. If votes on a decision are tied, the vote of the Prime Minister outweighs. Voting is public unless the Rules of Procedure stipulate a secret vote on particular issues. Normally the Government makes decisions by consensus. In line with its Rules of Procedure, the Government passes conclusions on each debated item, upon a proposal of the Prime Minister.    Ministries and other state administrative bodies mandatorily submit their materials to the Government with a memorandum and an accompanying letter. The memorandum is a summarised document, with clear information on the material content, especially on the fiscal implications; then on the mode of publicising, etc. A statement of conformity of proposed acts with the EU legislation is obligatory, etc. Materials relating to strategic or other important issues are submitted by the proposer not later than 15 days, and other materials not later than 8 days before the day of the Government session at which they are to be reviewed. By exception, the proposer may propose certain issues to be put on the agenda of the Government session after it has been convened, if they are urgent and cannot be delayed. In such cases the proposer is obliged to submit the material to the Government with a special explanation not later than three days before the day of the session. The Government establishes permanent or temporary working bodies for examining and establishing positions, giving opinions and preparing proposals for the resolution of particular issues in Government's competence.  Permanent working bodies are the general and specific committees. The chairpersons and members of working bodies are appointed upon the proposal of the Prime Minister. The Secretary of the Legislative Secretariat of the Government participates in the work of the working bodies. An absent member is represented by a deputy minister or a state secretary. The Chair of the working body is responsible for the organisation and preparation of the body’s sessions, convenes and chairs the sessions, proposes the agenda and sees to realise the conclusions of the working bodies. The working body decides with a majority vote from the total number of members. The Government has three general committees: the Committee on Political System, the Committee on Economic System and Economic Policy, and the Committee on Human Resources and Sustainable Development. These committees deliberate on draft legal acts, and on implementation of policies and legislation within their terms of reference. Harmonisation of the national policies with the policies of the European Union and harmonisation of the legal system with the EU acquis is also within their terms of reference of each committee.   The Committee on Political System covers the following areas: defence, including preparation in the field of defence that are in the competence of the Government; security; foreign affairs, functioning of parliamentary democracy and the rule of law; decentralisation of the government and the development of local self-government; judicial system; information system; organisation and functioning of state bodies and the reform of public administration.  The Committee on Economic System and Economic Policy covers the following areas: strategic priorities and measures for implementation; stimulation of sustainable economic development and a balanced spatial and regional development; scientific and technology development; establishing material, energy and other balances; environment protection and sustainable development; finances and tax policies;  agriculture; economic relations with other states and global integration processes; urban planning, banking and insurance; long-term securities; market and prices, public consumption; technical culture and innovations; housing and utilities and the standard of living; tourism; and property relations. The Committee monitors the overall economic development and proposes measures of economic policies through adopting and implementing the macroeconomic policy; monitors the material condition of the economy and public consumption through adopting and executing the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia. The Committee on Human Resources and Sustainable Development covers the following areas:  education, science, arts, culture, youth and sports, and the organisation and conditions for work in these areas as well as specialised training of the staff; employment rate and employment; healthcare; social security and social insurance; special protection of children; health, pension and disability insurance; social protection of veterans, war invalids and civilian victims of war; the situation and the rights of the Macedonians in the neighbouring countries and Macedonian ex-patriates, promoting cultural development and relations with them; reintegration and repatriation of returnees and emigrants and other matters related to returnees and emigrants. Specific committees of the Government are: Committee on Privatisation; Committee on Housing; Committee on Special Purpose Production; Committee on Appointment. The Committee on Privatisation reviews the conditions and the methods of privatisation of the social property; proposes legislative and other measures for its realisation; reviews the conditions in enterprises covered with the programmes for privatisation of ownership; expresses opinion on the development programs that are to be financed by the Privatisation Agency; reviews the Annual Programme and the Financial Programme on the operation of the Privatisation Agency of the Republic of Macedonia, assesses its performance, suggests the method of sale of shares and equities gained on the basis of state capital, separately and jointly with the shares and equities issued to the Agency; suggests to the Government to appoint representatives in boards of companies and/or organisations with state shares, as well as the shares and equities issued to the Agency; and performs other activities within its competence, determined by law. The Committee on Housing: decides on renting of flats owned by the Republic of Macedonia to high officials appointed on public and other positions set forth in the Constitution and the Law; is in charge of citizens under social assistance programme and persons without permanent dwelling in accordance with the Law on Social Protection and the Law on Special Rights of the Security Forces Members of the Republic of Macedonia and members of their families; is in charge of persons whose housing rights have been terminated in accordance with the Law on Denationalisation; is in charge of persons from areas that have suffered from natural disasters and epidemics, as well as of employees in state bodies who carry out special duties necessary to enable the operations of the body they work for.  The Committee on Special Purpose Production monitors the conditions and the development of the production of weapons and military equipment in times of peace; the development and the adjustment of basic and additional capacities for the production of weapons and military equipment, as well as the production of sanitary materials and other products, equipment and services for defence purposes. The Committee on Appointments is responsible for: human resources policy within the Government’s competence; opinions or proposals to the Government with regard to nomination, appointment or dismissal of a state administrative body director or his/her deputies, the Secretary General and the state secretaries; issues related to management bodies of public enterprises appointed by the Government or appointed upon prior opinion, proposal or accord with the Government; implementation of the Government conclusions related to the human resources policy; matters concerning salaries of appointed officials; issues related to the immunity rights of the Government members.  The Government established councils as permanent advisory bodies and there are two such councils: the Legal Council and the Economic Council. Upon a request of the Government or upon their own initiative, the advisory councils discuss and give opinions on particular legal, economic and other issues. The Legal Council discusses issues related to: the implementation of the principle of rule of law; development of the legal system and its compatibility with EU legislation; safeguarding of human rights and citizens’ rights and freedoms, legal protection of ownership; as well as other issues of importance to the function of the constitutional, political and legal system. The Economic Council discusses especially issues related to: the functioning of the free market and entrepreneurship principle; providing equal legal position for all subjects on the market; balanced regional development of the Republic of Macedonia and development of the underdeveloped areas; Macedonia’s integration into the single European market; and Macedonia’s co-operation with international financial organisations and institutions.  The Advisory Councils have a Chairperson and members, of whom the Chairperson and two members are also Government members. The members of the Legal and Economic Council are selected: from the rank of academics; one civil servant in the General Secretariat and one - civil servants in the Office of the Prime Minister. The Chairperson and the members of the Legal and Economic Council are appointed and dismissed by the Government upon the Prime Minister’s proposal. The Secretary of the Legislative Secretariat attends the sessions of the Legal and Economic Council.  The Secretary General of the Government holds regular meetings with the state secretaries in the ministries, the Secretary of the Legislative Secretariat, and designate state advisors in order to coordinate the preparation of Government sessions and ensure the completeness of the materials and acts for the Government session.  The Legislative Secretariat, established by the Law on the Government carries out duties related to securing the consistency of the legal system. The Secretariat issues opinions on all draft legal acts adopted or proposed by the Government. The Secretariat considers conformity of draft legal acts with the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia, with the EU legislation and with international treaties ratified in accordance with the Constitution. The Secretariat also gives expert opinion on regulations concerning the municipalities if the Ministry of Local Self-Government requires such an opinion.  The Government by its Decision has established a General Secretariat as a service of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 12/01), which provides administrative support to the Government as a whole, to the Prime Minister, to the deputy prime ministers and to the ministers.  The ministries and other government bodies establish coordination and co-operation with the General Secretariat in the implementation of the Annual Work Programme of the Government. In addition, the General Secretariat coordinates  the establishment and realisation of the Government’s strategic priorities with ministries and other administrative bodies.  The Public Attorney’s Office (Law on Public Attorney’s Office – “Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 47/97), is a service of the Government that undertakes measures for the legal protection of property rights and interests of the Republic of Macedonia.  The Government has also established the General Affairs Service of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/98, 45/98, 28/99, 61/99, 21/01, 30/01, 21/03 and 69/03), which provides financial, clerical and logistic support for the functions of the Government.   The Government has established 14 Commissions for second-instance administrative procedures securing the right to an appeal against first-instance decisions delivered by various administrative bodies.  In addition, an Inter-ministerial State Commission for the Fight against Illegal production, Trade and Abuse of Narcotic Drugs was established.  Pursuant to specific laws the Government appoints chairman and members of other bodies whose tasks have been determined by these laws. In the exercise of its duties as determined by the Constitution and law, as well as to enforce laws the Government adopts legal acts: decrees, decisions, instructions, programmes, rulings (individual decisions), and conclusions, decrees with the force of law and guidelines (for more details see I_C_11). The Government determines guidelines and positions on enforcement of the laws and other regulations that regulate the operation of ministries, other state administrative bodies and administrative organisations in their enforcement of the laws and other regulations. In addition, the Government determines deadlines for adopting acts for the aforementioned bodies, and determines the modes of co-operation with other state administrative bodies as well as other issues important for the realisation of the operations of these bodies. In the exercise of its rights and duties, the Government harmonises and guides the work of state administrative bodies and may determine general principles regarding the implementation of the determined policy and enforcement of the laws and other regulations and by-laws of the Assembly and the Government; may order these bodies to adopt regulations and undertake measures within their authority; may determine deadlines on execution of particular tasks in their authority; may request them to inspect the condition in areas of their authority; and may submit a report to the Government with respective proposals. Organisation and Operation of the State Administration The Government of the Republic of Macedonia as the holder of the executive power is responsible for the coordination and internal organisation of all state administrative bodies. The Ministry of Justice is institutionally responsible for supervision of the implementation of regulations determining the organisation and operation of the state administrative bodies. With such a defined role the Government of the Republic of Macedonia harmonises and supervises the work of state administration which is regulated by the Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 58/00 and 44/02). This Law is adopted with a two-third majority vote of the total number of Representatives of the Assembly. Pursuant to this law state administrative bodies perform their competences on the basis of legality, responsibility, efficiency, cost-effectiveness, transparency, equity and predictability. They are obliged to provide citizens efficient exercise of their constitutional freedoms and rights. State administrative bodies directly enforce the laws, adopt regulations for their enforcement, and carry out administrative supervision as well as other administrative matters. Ministries and other state administrative bodies are, in accordance with laws, autonomous in carrying out operations within their competence. They are accountable to the Government for their work. Within their competences they provide for the efficient and legal exercise of rights and interests determined by law to all participants in administrative procedures.  The ministries, as a part of the executive power, perform administrative and other duties within their scope of activity, and they particularly implement the policy of enforcement of laws and other regulations passed by the Assembly as well as Government regulations. They are also responsible to enforce laws and other regulations; draft proposals of to adopt a law laws that the Government proposes; prepare the regulations passed by the Government; execute Government’s positions and guidelines regarding the operation of state administrative bodies; monitor conditions in their scope of competence; give initiatives for resolution of issues in their scope of competence; resolve administrative issues; when authorised perform supervision of legality of acts and the operation of companies, institutions and other legal persons; carry out administrative and inspection supervision and other administrative matters when they have been given authority by law. State administrative bodies directly enforce the laws and other regulations and by-laws.  The minister represents the ministry, organises and secures the legal and efficient execution of tasks and duties; adopts regulations and other acts for which he/she is authorised and undertakes other measures within the ministry’s competence pursuant to law; makes decision on rights, duties and responsibilities of civil servants and other employees of the ministry without the status of civil servants, unless otherwise determined by law. The minister has a deputy appointed and dismissed by the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia upon the proposal of the Prime Minister. The deputy minister acts on behalf of the minister when he/she is absent or cannot carry out his/her duties due to illness or other reasons. In such cases the deputy takes over all authorities and responsibilities. In addition the deputy in co-operation with the minister carries out activities in the minister's competence if they are delegated to him/her.  The minister may authorise a civil servant to deliver individual decisions regarding administrative matters. He/she may also authorise a civil servant to sign acts, make decisions on particular issues and carry out other activities within the ministry's competence, unless the law specifically determines that such acts are only under the minister's competence. The ministries (also comprising local offices at local self-government units) and other administrative bodies and organisations (independent bodies of the state administration and administrative organisations) are the central bodies of the state administration.  The ministries are the following: Ministry of Defence, Ministry of the Interior, Ministry of Justice, Ministry of Foreign Affairs, Ministry of Finance, Ministry of Economy, Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Resources Management, Ministry of Health, Ministry of Education and Science, Ministry of Labour and Social Policy, Ministry of Local Self-Government, Ministry of Culture, Ministry of Transport and Communication, and Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning. Administrative bodies within ministries are established for an administrative area under the ministry’s competence and they generally perform administrative, professional and other activities with a certain degree of autonomy in operations (offices, bureaus, services, inspectorates, and port authorities). They generally carry out activities that demand specific expertise and modes of operations within the ministry. Administrative bodies are accountable to the respective ministries for their work. Administrative bodies within ministries are managed by a director, principal inspector, etc. Bodies within the ministries without the capacity of a legal person are: at the Ministry of the Interior – the Security and Counter-Intelligence Directorate and the Public Security Bureau; Ministry of Justice – State Administrative Inspectorate, Directorate for the Execution of Sanctions; Ministry of Finance – State Foreign Exchange Inspectorate; Financial Police, Directorate for  Prevention of Money Laundering and the Public Procurement Bureau; Ministry of Economy – Special Purpose Production Authority, State Market Inspectorate, State Inspectorate for Technical Inspection; Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Economy – Veterinary Directorate, Water Economy Directorate, Hydro Meteorological Directorate, Seed and Planting Material Directorate, Plants Protection Directorate, and State Forestry and Hunting Inspectorate; Ministry of Health – State Sanitary and Health Inspectorate, Bureau of Medicines and the Food Directorate; Ministry of Education and Science – Pedagogic Service, Office for Development and Promotion of Education in Languages of Communities and the State Education Inspectorate; Ministry of Labour and Social Policy – Department of War Veterans and the State Labour Inspectorate; Ministry of Local Self-Government – State Inspectorate for Local Self-Government; Ministry of Culture – Office for the Affirmation and Promotion of the Culture of Communities in the Republic of Macedonia and the Directorate for the Protection of Cultural Heritage; Ministry of Transport and Communications – Port Authority, State Transport Inspectorate, State Inspectorate for Civil Engineering and Urban Planning and the State Communal Inspectorate;  Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning – State Environment Inspectorate, Service for Environment, Service for Spatial Information System.
Other state administrative bodies according to the organisation type and the level of autonomy may be established only as autonomous state administrative bodies (directorates, agencies, commissions, offices, bureaus, inspectorates) as well as administrative organisations established to perform activities that require specific technical expertise (institutes, archives, etc). The remaining state administrative bodies and administrative organisations are autonomous and have a capacity of a legal person. They carry out administrative and other activities in their competence, and especially requiring technical expertise. They also make decisions upon administrative matters when authorised by law; co-operate with state administrative bodies and local self-government units as well as with other legal persons. For their work they are accountable to the Government of the Republic of Macedonia i.e. to the respective minister. An autonomous administrative body is managed by a head or a director appointed and dismissed by the Government. Bodies within the ministries with the capacity of a legal person are: Ministry of Justice – Bureau for Forensic Expertise; Ministry of Finance – Public Revenue Office, Property and Legal Affairs Administration, Customs Administration and the Commodity Reserves Bureau; Ministry of Economy – Monopoly Authority, Tourism Bureau, and the Metrology Bureau; Ministry of Education and Science – Education Development Bureau; Ministry of Local Self-Government – Bureau for the Economically Underdeveloped Regions; Ministry of Transport and Communications – Telecommunications Directorate and Civil Aviation Authority; Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning – Geodetic Directorate. Autonomous state administrative bodies are the following: Commission for Relations with Religious Communities; Youth and Sport Agency, Emigration Agency; Agency of Information; Development and Investment Agency; Protection and Rescue Directorate; Directorate for Protection of Classified  Informatio; Agency for Promotion of Entrepreneurshipand the Foreign Investment Agency. Administrative organisations are the following: State Archives of the Republic of Macedonia; State Authority for Geodetic Works; State Statistical Office; and State Office of Industrial Property. Legal entities vested with public authority are the following: Pension and Disability Insurance Fund; Health Insurance Fund; Employment Agency; Fund for National and Regional Roads; Privatisation Agency; Agency for Supervision of Fully Funded Pension Insurance; Central Registry; Securities Commission; Directorate for Free Economic Zones; Institute for Accreditation, and Institute for Standardisation. The Decree on the Principles of Internal Organisation of State Administrative Bodies as well as general acts on the internal organisation and systematisation of posts in the ministries and other state administrative bodies (independent and administrative organisations) determines the number of civil servants and other persons needed to carry out determined tasks and duties. These regulations also determine the required professional conditions for the execution of duties, the authorities and responsibilities of civil servants and other issues important for the operation of state administrative bodies. Rulebooks on internal organisation and systematisation are adopted by the minister or the Director. Funds required for the operation of ministries and other state administrative bodies are provided from the state budget. Funds intended for delegated competences of local self-government units, i.e. for legal and natural persons with public authorities, are secured in accordance with particular laws on the budget of the Republic of Macedonia.   Ministries or directors, when authorised by law, adopt rulebooks, orders, guidelines, plans, programmes, rulings and other acts for the enforcement of laws and other regulations (for more details see I_C_11). The acts adopted by the minister may not determine rights and duties to citizens and other legal persons nor may they prescribe competences to other bodies. The minister may adopt mandatory instructions for the execution of duties that have been entrusted to him/her as a public authority pursuant to law, and which are carried out by public enterprises and other legal and natural persons, as well as by local self-government units and the City of Skopje.  Ministers or directors pass individual decisions in administrative procedures regarding particular issues and in other circumstances (for more details see I_C_9). Local Offices (units) of the Ministries  Local offices of the ministries are established at the local self-government units within ministries or other state administrative bodies as their internal organisational forms. Such organisation is determined by the Ministry's act on internal organisation. Local offices of the ministry at the local self-government units carry out administrative and other expert activities in administrative areas for which they have been organised. They directly implement the laws and other regulations and see to their enforcement; they make decisions in first-instance administrative procedures if such decision-making has not been granted the ministry or to a legal person with public mandate; they carry out administrative and inspection supervision; monitor the condition in areas under their competence; and propose measures for the promotion of the situation in particular administrative areas. In general, local offices are managed by a head of sector or head of unit. They are appointed and dismissed by the minister or the director, in a selection procedure with public announcement. Heads of sectors and units of local offices are accountable to the minister or the secretary general or the director for their work. The selection procedure is carried out by the Civil Servants Agency. 6. What is the legal basis for the status of civil servants and other public employees? Is there a public administration law or regulation defining the status of public servants, including independence, recruitment and career structures and remuneration? Are there specific rules applicable to specific categories of civil servants? How are public servants recruited? What are their conditions of service? Are there training institutions for public servants? Please provide statistics on training provided in the last three years. What percentage of public servants are (a) women and (b) from ethnic minorities (please provide details of grade and seniority if available). As a result of the established restrictive concept of state administration in the Republic of Macedonia, there is a clear distinction between the terms civil and public servant. Persons who carry out duties related to the state service and who are employed in the legislative, executive and the judicial branches, as well as in the state administration, other state bodies and municipal administration, are referred to as civil servants. The persons employed in services of public interest (education and science, health, social care, and culture) are referred to as public servants. Pursuant to the constitutional provision (Article 32) specifying that the rights and positions of employees are regulated by law and collective agreements, the status, rights, duties and responsibilities of civil servants and other public servants have been regulated by a law, by-laws and by collective agreements. The Law on Civil Servants first adopted in 2000 (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 59/00, 112/00, 34/01, 103/01, 43/02, 98/02, 17/03, 40/03, 85/03, 17/04 and 69/04), regulates issues of the status, rights, duties and responsibilities of civil servants, as well as the system of salaries and allowances for the civil servants. In accordance with the Law, a Civil Servants Agency has been established as an independent state body carrying out technical, administrative and other operations related to the status, rights, duties and responsibilities of civil servants. The Law does not specifically regulate issues of certain rights that are uniformly regulated for both the state and public sector in the general provisions on labour relations, such as: pension and disability insurance, health insurance, unemployment insurance, vacations and leaves, protection at the workplace, and termination of employment. The status, rights, duties and responsibilities of specific categories of civil servants are regulated by other laws. The particularities that differentiate these civil servants from other civil servants are related to the performance of duties, which in turn require special rules on employment selection, promotion and other elements. Hence, these are generally a characteristic of the career systems as opposed to the system of jobs applicable for the civil servants in accordance with the Law on Civil Servants. The provisions in the Law on Civil Servants do not refer to: military and civil personnel in the Army of the Republic of Macedonia; uniformed employees in the Ministry of the Interior; employees in penitentiary and correctional institutions; employees in the forest, judicial and financial police and the Customs Administration; employees with special duties and authorities in the Ministry of the Defence, the Ministry of the Interior, the Intelligence Agency, the Public Revenue Office, and the Customs Administration; the authorised state auditors and persons performing state audit at the State Audit Office; as well as employees in the Civil Aviation Authority who perform duties and tasks of importance to the safety of aviation. Law on Civil Servants The definition of the term civil servant in the Republic of Macedonia has been formulated on the basis of a functional and organisational criterion (the type and character of operations and duties performed by the civil servant in the administrative body he/she works for). According to the functional criterion, a civil servant is a person who performs professional, normative, executive, and administrative-supervising activities, and decides upon administrative matters in accordance with the Constitution and  law. According to the organisational criterion, a civil servant is a person who performs duties in the state administrative bodies (ministries, bodies within ministries, autonomous administrative bodies and organisations within the executive branch); in local self-government units and the City of Skopje; in administrative services of the Assembly, of the President, of the Government, and of the Constitutional Court and Supreme Court; in basic and appellate courts; in the Judicial Council of the Republic; in the Ombudsman’s Office; in the Public Prosecutor's Office; in the Civil Servants Agency; and the State Audit Office. Depending on the official tasks they perform, civil servants have been classified in three groups: managerial civil servants, expert civil servants and expert-administrative civil servants. The managerial and expert civil servants have a high education while expert-administrative ones have a post-secondary or secondary  education. Within these three groups, civil servants are divided into 13 positions. Managerial civil servants may acquire the following positions: secretary general i.e. state secretary; state advisor; head of sector; assistant to the head of sector and head of unit. Expert civil servants have the following positions: advisor, senior associate, associate and junior associate. The group of expert-administrative civil servants includes the following positions: independent officer, senior officer, officer and junior officer. Within the municipal administration there are no positions of a secretary general and a state secretary. This classification provides for a uniform structure of positions in the bodies of administrative, executive and judicial branches, as well as in local self-government units. At the same time there is a distinction between the political and professional positions in the state administration, as well as a clear division of employees with a status of civil servants and employees without such status – and these are persons performing administrative-technical or assistance duties (couriers, drivers, guards, sanitary workers, etc.) to whom general provisions on labour relations apply. Employment of civil servants Civil servants are recruited in an open and transparent manner, through a public vacancy announcement and a requirement to undergo a professional examination. There are two exceptions to this rule pertaining to the position of secretary general and state secretary, as well as to what is known as horizontal mobility of civil servants. Selection procedures and employment of civil servants are based on two basic principles: the constitutional principle of equal work opportunities and the merit principle – selection on the basis of capabilities. In addition, the principle of equitable representation of citizens belonging to communities is applied to all positions as determined by the Law, without contravening the criteria on expertise and competence. The public vacancy announcements for civil servants are publicised by the Civil Servants Agency (hereinafter: the CSA) at least in two daily newspapers of which at least one published in an official language spoken by at least 20% of the citizens. The public announcement contains general and special conditions for the specific advertised position. The Law on Civil Servants defines six mandatory general conditions that need to be met by every applicant for a position in the state administration: to be a citizen of the Republic of Macedonia; to be of legal age; to have adequate level of education as required for the position; to have the necessary work experience, except for the positions of junior associate and junior officer; not to be sentenced to a security measure of prohibition to perform a certain profession, activity or duty; and to be of good general health capability. In addition, internal acts on systematisation of posts in administrative bodies employing civil servants determine special employment conditions related to the specific needs for the performance of a concrete post. They generally relate to the type of required education, knowledge of a foreign language, IT knowledge and other additional skills required for the post.  Applicants who meet the general and specific conditions also undergo a vocational exam. On the basis of their results and educational background, the CSA prepares a list of at least five successful candidates and submits it to the commission for the implementation of the employment procedure which has been established by the administrative body offering employment. Within the five-member commission of the administrative body, members of non-majority communities must be equitably represented. In the event that the CSA cannot compose a list of at least five candidates, the procedure is repeated from the beginning (with a new public vacancy announcement). If after the repeated procedure the Agency cannot make a list of at least five candidates, a list may be made with less than five candidates. The Commission, on the basis of the list, shortlists three candidates for each position and submits it to both the secretary general and state secretary or to the official in charge of the administrative body in which a secretary general or a state secretary is not appointed, who makes the final selection. Dissatisfied candidates have a right to lodge a complaint against the decision for selection within eight days from the day they have been informed in writing. The CSA must decide on the complaint within 15 days from the day it has received the complaint. The complaint defers the execution of the decision. After the completion of the selection procedure, the secretary general, the state secretary or the official in charge of the administrative body in which a secretary general or a state secretary is not appointed, adopts a decision for employment of a civil servant. The employment procedure of civil servants for the positions of junior associate and junior officer differs in that they do not undergo a vocational exam. After the selection they are required to undergo an internship of six and 12 months for expert-administrative and expert positions respectively. In the course of interning they are monitored and evaluated in accordance with the Rulebook on the Mode, Procedure and Criteria for the Execution of the Vocational and Intern Exam (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 59/01). One month prior to the expiry of this period, the intern takes an intern exam before the Commission that has selected him or her for the position. If the intern passes the exam he/she is employed in the position for which the announcement has been published. If not, his or her employment is terminated. The employment procedure is finalised by giving and signing an oath. The oath is binding and if the civil servant refuses to give or sign an oath, it is deemed that the employment was not made. The signed oath is kept in the civil servant’s file. Secretaries general who are highest in rank in the Assembly, the President's Office, the Government, the Constitutional Court, the Supreme Court, the  Judicial Council of the Republic, the Ombudsman’s Office, the State Audit Office, the Civil Servants Agency and the Public Prosecutor’s Office, are appointed by these bodies from the ranks of managerial civil servants. State secretaries have been envisioned for the ministries and they are appointed by the Government upon the minister’s proposal from the ranks of managerial civil servants in the ministries and other state administrative bodies. The term of office of the secretaries general and state secretaries is the same as the term of office of the body appointing them, i.e. of the official in charge of the body. In cases of horizontal mobility, the civil servant may be transferred from one to another body to a position of an equal rank without a public announcement, if the Secretary General, State Secretary or the heads of these bodies agree and when the needs of the service necessitate such transfer, upon prior opinion of the Agency. Rights and duties of civil servants The rights and duties of civil servants are defined by the Law on Civil Servants. An important segment of the Law is the legal guarantee for the protection of the civil servant's rights deriving from his/her employment. The civil servant has a right to request protection before the competent court, trade union or other state body in exercising these rights. The Law on Civil Servants regulates the following rights: the right to political activity; the right to professional training and development; the right to protection; the right to found or be a member of a trade union; the right to strike; the right to salary and other allowances; the right to vacation and leave (this right in the Republic of Macedonia is equal for civil servants and other employees in the public and private sectors). With regard to the right to political activity the Law prescribes that the civil servant may be an active member in a political party; however, by exercising this right he/she must not put in question his/her status of a civil servant, or the performance of the official duties related to that status. In addition, the civil servant may not wear or place party symbols in the office. In order to exercise their economic and social rights, civil servants have the right to establish trade unions and to be their members under the terms and in a manner defined by law, and they have the right to strike. When exercising their right to strike, civil servants are obliged to ensure a minimum of uninterrupted execution of functions of the body, the necessary level in exercising of citizens’ and legal entities’ rights and interests and the execution of ratified international agreements. The minister, or the head of the body, by way of regulation, defines the manner of exercise of the functions of the body during a strike, as well as the number of civil servants who are obliged to work to execute those functions so as to meet the conditions for ensuring the minimum of uninterrupted execution of functions and the necessary level in exercising of citizens’ and legal persons’ rights and interests and the execution of ratified international agreements. During a strike the civil servant is entitled to a salary in the amount of 60% of the salary he/she had received the month before. Civil servants are obliged to perform their duties conscientiously, professionally, efficiently, orderly and timely, in accordance with the Constitution and law. Furthermore, the civil servant is obliged to perform his/her activities impartially and without the influence of political parties; he/she may not be guided by his/her own political beliefs or personal financial interests; he/she must refrain from misuse of authorisations and the status of a civil servant and protect the reputation of the body. The civil servant is obliged to execute the orders of the minister, of the head of the body, or of the immediate superior civil servant and to act upon them in accordance with the Constitution, law or other regulation. However, if the civil servant deems that the order he/she has received is not in accordance with the Constitution, law or other regulation, he/she is obliged to point out that fact to the person that issued the order. The civil servant shall act upon a repeated order unless he/she deems that its execution would constitute a criminal offence. If the civil servant does not warn the immediate superior civil servant, the civil servant and his/her immediate superior civil servant shall be liable for execution. The protection of data defined as a state or official secret is one of the responsibilities of the civil servant, who is obliged to keep the secret in a mode and under conditions determined by law or other regulation. The obligation for keeping an official secret is valid for a period of three years after the termination of the service. On the other hand, the civil servant is, in accordance with law, obliged to provide information upon request of the citizens required for exercise of their rights and interests, except the information classified as state or official secret. The Code of Ethics for Civil Servants (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 96/01and 16/04) determines the manner of civil servants’ behaviour and conduct in order to secure the respect of principles of legality, professional integrity, efficiency, and loyalty during the execution of their official duties. Promotion of civil servants The state administration system in the Republic of Macedonia, pursuant to the Law on Civil Servants, has been defined as a system of jobs in which promotion is not automatic. In such a system, a prerequisite for "promotion" of the civil servant is a vacant position of a higher rank than that of the civil servant. However, the  procedure for filling of vacancies is in fact a procedure for a new employment (public announcement and a procedure of competition), as defined above. System of Salaries and Allowances The salary of a civil servant consists of a general and exceptional component. The general component consists of: basic salary, position supplement and career supplement. The exceptional component consists of: demanding job supplement and non-regular supplement (overtime work). The basic salary paid to a civil servant provides for rewarding of the appropriate educational level of the job he/she is assigned to, and rewarding of the work experience, regardless of where such experience has been acquired. Hence, the education level is valued with an adequate number of points: higher education – 200 points; post-secondary – 150 points and secondary – 100 points. The work  experience is valued in amount of 0.5% of the part of the basic salary that rewards the educational level for each year of work  experience entered upon, but not higher than of 20%. The position supplement is valued as follows: 
Group Position Points 
Secretary General 660 State Secretary 625 State Advisor 470 Head of sector  450 Assistant to the head of sector 360 Head of unit 300 II Advisor 235 II Senior Associate 200 II Associate 185 II Junior Associate 155 III Independent officer 150 III Senior officer 135 III Officer 120 III Junior officer 100 The value of a point for the salaries of civil servants employed in the state administration is determined every year by a Governmental decision. The value of the point for 2004 was 40.10 MKD and is the same for 2005. The value of a point for the salaries of civil servants employed in the municipal administration is determined every year by a decision for the execution of the Budget in every municipality, and in 2004 it was not higher than 40.10 MKD. Civil servants in every position except for the secretary general and the state secretary, is entitled to a career supplement. This approach in the salary system gives an opportunity for the so-called horizontal career of civil servants. Namely, the civil servant under special terms determined by law may be entitled to a higher salary for the same position. In other words, the civil servants may advance with regard to the amount of his or her salary, but not in the hierarchical sense. The horizontal career has four levels: level A, level B, level C and level D. Level A is acquired after three years of work experience as a civil servant and is 5% of the position supplement. Level B is acquired after three years of work experience at the level A, and is 10% of the career supplement. Level C is acquired after three years of work experience at level B, and is 15% of the career supplement. Level D is acquired after three years of work experience at level C, and is 20% of the career supplement. By exception, when a civil servant is evaluated with the mark "outstanding" for two consecutive years, he/she may be promoted in the career to a higher level one year earlier than defined. Hence, this element in the salary of the civil servant depends on his or her length of experience in the civil service and the results from his or her work recorded in the annual assessment. Civil servants, apart from the right to salary supplements pursuant to the general labour relations provisions, are also entitled to other allowances: travelling, daily and other expenses for business trips; expenses made by usage of personal vehicles for office purposes; expenses for life separate from the family; expenses for change of the place of residence; transport to and from work; food expenses; expenses for field work; funeral expenses in case of death of a civil servant or of a member of his/her family; damages suffered in natural disasters, and expenses for a long illness of a civil servant. The system of salaries and allowances for civil servants entered into force in April 2004, but only partially (the basic salary component without the career supplement). Its full implementation shall start on 1 April 2006. The implementation of the salary system and its basic component is done in a period of two years in which the amount of current salaries is levelled with the amount as defined by the Law. Due to limited budgetary resources, the levelling of salaries through the partial implementation of the salary system is implemented in stages, in a mode determined by the Guidelines for the Mode of Definition and Payment of Salaries for Civil Servants (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 31/04). The nominal value of the basic salary that will be paid in March 2006 is calculated so that the total points for the basic salary (the points for the respective level of education and the points for the working experience) and the points for position supplement are multiplied by the value of the point as determined by a Decision of the Government, pursuant to the Law on Civil Servants. Budgetary beneficiaries are required to file an F-2 form to the Ministry of Finance, which contains: personal identification number; name and last name; ethnicity; position; level of education required for the position as established by the act on systematisation of posts; length of work experience; salary amount not including the points for work  experience; the points for work  experience; as well as other data. On the basis of submitted data in the F-2 form, the Ministry of Finance calculates the monthly amount of increase or decrease of salary for each civil servant. The starting salary of the civil servant employed in the period when salaries are levelled is determined in accordance with the amount of the salary of a civil servant with the same position (employed in the same body) paid in the preceding month, including the points for work  experience. The levelling of the salary of a civil servant who is transferred from another administrative body in the period of levelling continues from the calculation already done in the body where the civil servant had worked. The levelling i.e. decompression of salaries is a correction of individual salaries of civil servants in a period of 24 months until the final levelling of the salaries in the civil service has been achieved, with the respect of the principle "equal pay for work of equal value” and the equitable remuneration in accordance to specified criteria.  Assessment of civil servants The assessment of civil servants aims to strengthen the responsibility of civil servants and improve the quality of their work and the services they offer. The assessment system was first introduced in 2004 and hence the first assessments shall be given in the first quarter of 2005, as prescribed by the Law. Pursuant to the Law, the assessment of managerial civil servants is carried out by the official in charge of the body, while the assessment of expert and expert-administrative servants is carried out by the immediate superior of the civil servant, i.e. the head of the sector. The system also envisages that the assessment should be carried out for all civil servants, except for the secretary general and the state secretary. The assessment is carried out on the basis of monitoring the work of the civil servant and on the basis of several other standardised criteria: expert knowledge and capability, efforts, results, creativity and conscientiousness. The civil servant must be assessed with one of the following grades: “outstanding,” “satisfactory,” and “unsatisfactory.” The assessment is a basis for the civil servant’s exercise of certain rights. On the one hand, consecutive positive grades provide for a speedier promotion of the civil servant in the horizontal career levels, resulting in a higher salary. On the other, one negative grade is a basis for reassignment to a lower position and a decrease in salary, while two consecutive or three negative grades in a period of five years are a basis for termination of employment by force of law. The two types of consequences should provide for a speedier development of a professional, competent and efficient administration in which poor quality of work and services to the detriment of citizens’ rights and interests would not be tolerated. Professional development and training of civil servants A specialised institution for training of the civil servants has not been established in the Republic of Macedonia. This, however, does not mean that the question of training has been neglected in the legislation or that training of civil servants is lacking. On the contrary, the Law on Civil Servants sets forth a framework which defines the system of training and which rests upon the basic principles it determines - that every civil servant has a right and duty to be trained on the basis of annual programmes adopted by respective bodies and financed from the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia. The CSA, pursuant to the Law, is competent to coordinate activities pertaining to the expert training of civil servants as well as to promote the efficient and effective operations of civil servants. In that respect, the CSA has prepared a document titled “The System of Training of Civil Servants in the Republic of Macedonia,” which defines the basic principles of the training policy, the division of roles between the CSA and every administrative body employing civil servants, the structures for coordination, the funding model and how to provide training. In the last three years since its establishment the CSA has continuously been carrying out generic training and other forms of professional development for all civil servants in the Republic of Macedonia. According to the records of the Sector for International Cooperation and Professional Development within the CSA, in the period of 2002-2004 a total of 13 training programmes and other forms of professional development of civil servants were carried out. They have encompassed a total of 2044 civil servants. Topic of training Executive branch Assembly and other state bodies Courts and prosecutors Municipal administration Total participants High administrative training (HAT) 70 16 87 Specialised seminars in HAT 62 11 78 Middle management programme (MMP) 30 35 System of public administration and civil service in the RM 281 52 15 348 Civil service system in the RM 274 274 Procedure for harmonisation of acts on organisation and systematisation of posts, and the positions of civil servants in the municipalities pursuant to the LCS. 242 242 Mode and procedure of assessment 99 30 86 215 Human resources management 42 25 72 Assessment for the need of training of civil servants 24 10 34 Training of civil servants from the CSA 75 75 Rulebook on the procedure and mode for collecting and processing of data for the Civil Servants Central Register 34 40 Seminars within the Venice Commission 17 19 38 The institutional strengthening of local-self government in Macedonia through the strengthening of capacities and financial liability 159 159 Total 659 240 112 686 1697 Source: Civil Servants Agency The Government of the Republic of Macedonia in May 2000 adopted the “Strategy for Civil Servants Training in the Process of Macedonia's Approximation to the European Union". The strategy defines the aims, target groups, areas of EU training, methods, mode of funding, management and coordination with the activities for EU training, and evaluation and monitoring of training carried out. The implementation of the Strategy for EU Training is done through biennial Operational Training Plans, which determine the priority target groups of civil servants as well as the topics of training. The activities envisaged in the plans are in accordance with the identified needs for EU training of Macedonian civil servants and with the priorities of the European integration process. The funding of operational plans is secured from the Budget of the Republic and foreign donors. The first Operational Plan for the period of 2001-2002 and the second Operational Plan for the period of 2003-2004 were fully implemented. The realisation of the Project on Establishing a Centre for Continuous Training for the European Union within the Tempus programme of the European Commission started in 2003. In the first group of trainers for EU training a total of 59 participants were trained, of which 19 are civil servants. In addition to the EU training activities, a Programme for scholarship for post-graduate studies abroad on topics concerning the EU is under way. The funding of the programme is secured through the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia and foreign donors. On the basis of a public competition and the established selection procedure, a total of 20 scholarships have been hitherto awarded to junior cadres who are obliged to work for the state administration a certain period of time after they complete the studies.  The Sector for European Integration within the General Secretariat of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia has organised 33 trainings in the country for a total of 852 participants, of which over 90% are civil servants. At the same time, six summer schools and one seminar have been organised abroad, where a total of 22 civil servants have participated (See table 1. Review of Training in the Field of European Integration ) The following table gives an overview of trainings in the field of European integration organised by the Sector for European Integration.  Type of training Topic of training 
Participants Number of participants General trainings EU, European Legislation and Policies; European Integration  Process of the European Integration of Macedonia; Stabilisation and Association Agreement Civil Service System in Macedonia  Civil servants – employees in the sectors for European integration and in the normative and legal sectors in the state administrative bodies;  Members of inter-ministerial bodies for European integration  Judges, expert associates, prosecutors 357 Sectoral trainings  EU Internal Market and the RM; Competition; State Aid; Public Procurements. Justice and Home affairs; Asylum Action plan Local self-government Experiences of East European and Central European countries in the process of integration into the EU and the utilisation of pre-accession funds New financial perspective 2007-2013 of the EU and accessibility to EU funds aimed at the social and economic development  Civil servants of the state administrative bodies; members of respective working groups for the legislation approximation  Non-governmental sector Media; Academics 515 Strengthening of skills  Training management  Project cycle management Civil servants in charge of training management and development of human resources in the Civil Servants Agency and the ministries  26 TOTAL NUMBER OF PARTICIPANTS 898 Source: Sector for European Integration, General Secretariat of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia The Sector for European Integration has also organised participation in seminars abroad for a total of 22 participants - civil servants from the Sector for European Integration and from sectors for European integration within ministries and other state administrative bodies:   Intensive seminar on the EU – College of Europe – Bruges, Belgium;    Summer school on the EU for the countries of the SEE, in Blagoevgrad, Bulgaria;   Economic and social cohesion: challenges of the new EU – Limerick, Ireland;   Diplomacy and management in the EU negotiations – Dubrovnik, Croatia. Furthermore, for the purpose of successful realisation of Macedonia's obligations deriving from the transposition and implementation of the EU legislation, and especially for the purpose of achieving a greater capability for continuous analysis, elaboration and implementation of European standards in the national legislation, the TAIEX Office in Brussels organised 33 seminars in the period June-December 2004 for a total of 165 participants of which over 95% civil servants. The Centre was established in 1999 for the purpose of training of employees in courts and public prosecutor’s offices. From 2002 to 2004, apart from judges and public prosecutors, employees with a status of civil servants have also attended training.  In the course of 2003 and 2004, the Centre for Continuous Education of the Macedonian Judges’ Association organised 17 trainings in which a total of 153 civil servants from courts and public prosecutor’s offices participated. Government bodies employing civil servants also perform specific trainings in topics concerning these bodies. The Association of Local Self-Government Units (ALSGU) financially supported from by donors carried out training in municipal administration, encompassing 12 subject areas. According to the ALSGU’s records, 1704 employees in the municipal administration have undergone training, in the following topics: Topic Participants Financial management 108 Development of human resources 158 Local economic development 119 Civic participation 88 Relations with donors 527 Administrative operations 55 New competences with the decentralisation 61 Utilities 119 Public relations 76 Legislation 257 Urban planning 69 Public procurements 67 Total 1704 The CSA, the Ministry of Local Self-Government and the ALSGU on 23 October 2003 signed a Memorandum for Cooperation in the Area of Professional Training and Development of Civil Servants in the Municipal Administration. Pursuant to this Memorandum a trilateral Committee has been established as an institutional mechanism for coordination of activities in this field. Furthermore, with the UNDP's support, a unit has been established to perform expert and technical operations for the Committee. Liability of civil servants Pursuant to the Law on Civil Servants, the civil servant is personally responsible for the performance of the official tasks. The civil servant, except the Secretary General and the State Secretary are liable to disciplinary measures. The responsibility for a criminal offence or misdemeanour does not exclude the disciplinary liability of the civil servant. The civil servant is disciplinarily liable for a disciplinary irregularity and disciplinary offence. Any minor, insignificant violation of the official duties, or minor violation of the reputation of the service or of the civil servant is disciplinary irregularity. The disciplinary violation, on the other hand, is any major, significant violation of the official duties, or a major violation of the reputation of the service or of the civil servant. In the event of violation of the official duties, one of the following disciplinary measures may be taken against the civil servant based on a decision:  Public reprimand;   A fine in the amount of 10% to 30% of the monthly salary paid in the month before the violation of the official duties was committed.   Termination of employment.  Disciplinary irregularity is: not coming to work in the determined time and leaving work before the closing hours despite the reprimand by the immediate superior civil servant; disorderly maintenance of official documents and data; unjustified absence from work up to two working days during one calendar year, and failure to wear name-tags if such an obligation exists. The disciplinary measure for a disciplinary irregularity may be public reprimand or a fine of 10% of the monthly salary paid in the month before the disciplinary irregularity was committed. The measure is pronounced by the minister or the official in charge of the body after a prior written report submitted by the immediate superior civil servant. Disciplinary violation is:   Non-performance or unconscientious, indecent, untimely or negligent performance of the official duties;   Expressing and advocating personal political beliefs when performing the official tasks;   Refusing to provide or providing incorrect data to the state bodies, legal entities and to the citizens, if the provision of data is prescribed by law;   Illegal management of funds;   Refusing to perform the official tasks of the job he/she is assigned or refusal of orders given by the immediate superior civil servant;   Non-compliance with the act of the official prescribing the rules for work during a strike;   Not taking or partially taking the prescribed security measures for protection of the entrusted assets;   Causing major material damage;   Repeating a disciplinary irregularity;   Receiving gifts or other benefits; and   Refusal of professional training and development to which the civil servant is sent. A fine in amount of 10% to 30% of the monthly salary paid to the civil servant in the month before the disciplinary offence was done shall be imposed for the disciplinary offences listed under items 1 to 10. If there were harmful consequences for the body and if no mitigating circumstances have been found for the civil servant that committed the offence, the employment of the civil servant is terminated. A fine amounting 10% to 30% of the monthly civil servant’s salary paid in the month before the disciplinary offence was committed may be imposed for the disciplinary offence listed under item 11. The disciplinary measures against the civil servant related to disciplinary violation shall be decided upon by the minister or the head of the body, following a disciplinary procedure upon the proposal of the Commission for Disciplinary Procedure on Disciplinary Violation.  Apart from disciplinary liability, the Law on Civil Servants envisages financial liability for any damage that the civil servant causes either intentionally or due to complete negligence. The official in charge of the body founds a commission for determining the financial liability. Based on a report of the Commission the official in charge of the body determines the liability of the civil servant for compensation for the damage. The body in which the civil servant works is obliged to compensate the material damage caused by the civil servant to third parties in the course of performance of his/her official duties. The official in charge of the body may completely or partially release the civil servant from compensating the damage, if it were not done intentionally, or if the compensation for the damage may jeopardise the well-being of the civil servant and his/her family. Termination of employmentApart from cases of termination of employment regulated by general provisions on labour relations (with an agreement, by dismissal or by force of law), the Law on Civil Servants envisages the following grounds for termination of employment.   If he/she had been convicted of a criminal offence related to his/her official duties or other criminal offence that makes him/her unsuitable to perform the service;    If he/she was assessed with “unsatisfactory” grade for two consecutive times or for at least three times in the past five years;   When an intern civil servant does not pass the intern exam;   In cases when the civil servant does not accept reassignment to another position as a result of a received annual grade “unsatisfactory.”   In cases when the secretary general or the state secretary, after the expiry of his or her term of office or after his or her dismissal refuses the reassignment to another position;   When a disciplinary measure for disciplinary violation has been taken and when mitigating circumstances for the damages caused to the body have not been determined;   In cases of the so-called “redundancy“. Namely, the Law on Civil Servants prescribes that in case of termination or merge of the body, reduction of its competences, reduction of the amount of work or changes in its internal organisational structure by elimination of posts due to structural changes in the bodies, the civil servant who performed those duties is reassigned within the same body to a job in the same or a lower position. In cases of reassignment of a number of redundant civil servants, priority is given to single parents, a foster parent to a child of up to 7 years of age; parents of a severely disabled child; disabled at work; and one of the spouses who are employed with the same employer. If the civil servant is not reassigned to another position within a month or if he/she refuses the reassignment, his or her employment is terminated. 
Law on Military Service in the Republic of Macedonia The status of military personnel as a special category of civil servants has been regulated by the Law on Military Service in the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 62/02, 98/02, 25/03 and 71/03). Military personnel are military officers (officers and non-commissioned officers), professional soldiers and civilian persons in service of the Army. Authorised officers in the Ministry of Defence who are military officers fall under the competence of the Law on Military Service in the Republic of Macedonia. On the other hand, authorised officers in the Ministry of Defence, who are civilians, fall under the competence of general provisions on labour relations. Authorised officers in the Ministry of Defence are persons in charge of: collecting, documenting and analysing intelligence data relevant for the defence of the Republic; detecting and preventing intelligence and other subversive activity of foreign military intelligence and intelligence services conducted both within the country or from abroad and aimed against the defence of the Republic; detecting and preventing all forms of terrorist activities aimed against the Republic; performing counter-intelligence protection of tasks and plans, documents, material and technical means, areas, zones and objects of interest to the Republic; as well as persons in charge of preventing and detecting criminal offences in military units and institutions, in military bivouacking areas or areas where military personnel are trained, as well as in facilities and zones determined by the Government. Authorised officers are appointed by the Minister of Defence. Employment  Admittance of military personnel is carried out through employment in the Ministry of Defence by way of public announcement. The Law determines the general and special conditions that candidates need to meet in order to be employed as officers, non-commissioned officers, professional soldiers or civilian persons in military service. General conditions for admittance into the service are equal for all military personnel, i.e. they need to be citizens of the Republic of Macedonia; they need to be of legal age; they need to be physically fit for the performance of duties and they must not have been subject to a security measure of prohibition to conduct a profession, activity or duty. Depending on whether an officer, non-commissioned officer, professional soldier or civilian in service of the Army is admitted, special conditions set forth are: adequate education, age, and professional training. Rights and dutiesThe Law on Military Service in the Republic of Macedonia stipulates special rights and duties for military officers. The military officer is obliged to carry out his or her service conscientiously, professionally, efficiently, orderly and timely, in accordance with the Constitution and law and in accordance with international agreements ratified by the Republic of Macedonia. Military officers are obliged to: give and sign an oath that remains in force permanently; wear a military uniform; military identification, military book and special identification documents; carry out orders of the superior officer; keep state, military, official and business secrets, an obligation that remains in force even after the cessation of service; comply with the prohibition to participate in political campaigns and other public events during his/her working hours and with the prohibition to wear or display party symbols in office; and notify the superior in charge upon travelling abroad; they have the right to use coercive means or firearms in accordance with regulations. The right to strike is restricted and the military officer may use such rights not more than once a year. Military officers are entitled to free legal assistance when they are subject to criminal, misdemeanour or civil proceedings for the use of coercion, firearms or other interventions as well as for involvement in a traffic accident during service. Military officers are also entitled to free health care in both military and civilian health institution (under terms specified by law), and to insurance in case of death, bodily harm or loss of the ability to work resulting from the performance of service. The Law also regulates the rights to vacations and leaves as well as the working hours of military officers. The civilian persons are equal with military officers in the following rights and duties: giving an oath, executing an order, keeping and using firearms, keeping a secret, not participating in political campaigns, striking, using legal assistance, healthcare, insurance, travelling abroad, working hours, vacations and leaves. In the line of duty, military officers and civilian persons in the armed forces are entitled to a use of a military-owned apartment in the location of service, and if such apartment is not available they are entitled to compensation of rental expenses. Professional soldiers are entitled to a free accommodation in army barracks. Deployment and promotion  Orders for appointing, promoting, dismissing, reassigning, deploying, representing and other relations within the service for the officers with a rank of a major up to a colonel are issued by the Minister of Defence or a person authorised by him/her. As regards professional soldiers, non-commissioned officers and officers of a rank up to a captain, orders are issued by the Chief of General Staff of the Armed Forces or a person authorised by him/her. Orders for deployment, reassignment to a different post, dismissal due to professional development and training, sick leave and treatment, representing or for other relations within the civilian service are issued by the Chief of General Staff of the Armed Forces or by a person authorised by him/her. The promotion of military officers to a higher rank and their assignment to a specific duty depends on the assessment and the needs of the service. Conditions for promotion into a rank have been determined by the Law. Officers are promoted upon the proposal of the Commission established by the Chief of General Staff of the Armed Forces. Promotion into a rank of a professional soldier, non-commissioned officer and officer up to a captain is granted by the Chief of General Staff of the Armed Forces, while promotion into a rank of a major up to a colonel is granted by the Minister of Defence. The promotion in rank and assignment to a duty of the officers in the rank of a general is within the authority of the President of the Republic as  Commander-in-Chief of the Armed Forces of Macedonia. System of salaries and allowances The Law on Military Service determines the system of salaries and allowances for the military personnel. The salary consists of a basic salary and supplements. The basic salary of military personnel is determined according to the rank, duty, work experience and the army supplement. The supplements to the basic salary are the following: for performing a specific military service; for performing a high-risk service; for performing a service in the troops; for a special education level as determined by the act on formation for a specific duty; as well as for representation. The basic salary of civilians in service of the armed forces is determined in accordance with the education level for the position in which they have been assigned, duty, work experience, army supplement and career supplement. The supplements to the basic salary are the following: for performing a service in shifts or turns; for performing a high-risk service; for a special education level as determined by the act on formation for specific duty, and for representation. The salary value is determined in points, and the point value is the same for all military personnel. Military personnel are entitled to allowances for vacations, leaves in cases determined by law, sick leaves, pregnancy, birth and maternity leaves, child nourishment leaves, retraining and additional training, professional development and training, as well as for responding to summons of courts or other bodies. AssessmentIn the course of service, military personnel are subject to official assessment for the determination of their success in service, which in turn secures their promotion into a rank or assignment to a specific duty. The assessment is carried out every 12 months, and in exceptional cases determined by the Law it may be carried out for a period shorter than 12 months, but not shorter than six. Assessment is done on the basis of data compiled from the following criteria: expertise, professional efficiency, command and management, results from work and physical fitness. The data is assessed descriptively with the following grades: "especially distinguishes himself/herself", distinguishes himself/herself,” "good,” “satisfactory,” and “unsatisfactory." The assessment is carried out independently by the immediate superior and deputy superior or a manager or by a managing person who is an officer or a civilian with a higher education. The  Commission established by the Chief of General Staff of the Armed Forces decides on appeals against assessment. Professional development and trainingProfessional development and training for officers and non-commissioned officers, as one of the conditions for admittance into service is conducted by the Army. In the course of service and on the basis of plans and curricula, military personnel are obliged to attend training organised by the Army in the premises of the Military Academy, the Defence Training Centre and the Ministry of Defence, as well as in other institutions in the country and abroad. Training may be carried out both in the country and abroad. The training in the country is carried out in the Training Command, through basic courses for non-commissioned officers, while in the Military Academy there are courses for platoon commanders (basic course for officers). The training of military personnel (officers and non-commissioned officers) abroad is carried out through the bilateral co-operation with NATO-member states and Partnership for Peace, and through courses, seminars and participation into mutual military exercises. In the last three years trainings for 697 military personnel have been conducted, specifically: courses for officers for 105 military personnel; courses for platoon commanders for 166 military personnel; and courses for non-commissioned officers for 426 military personnel. Within the Strategic Defence Review, the remaining higher levels of training of officers and non-commissioned officers have been defined and they are currently developed. The dynamics of training shall be determined after the curricula are adopted. In the last three years there have been trainings for 885 military personnel abroad (USA, Canada, UK, France, Turkey, The Netherlands, Greece, Romania, Bulgaria, Italy, Germany and Switzerland), specifically for 322 officers, 178 non-commissioned officers, 373 professional soldiers and 12 civilians. LiabilityMilitary personnel are disciplinary liable for violation of the military duties and discipline, in a mode and procedure determined by the Law. A violation of the military discipline is every action of a military person that contravenes the provisions for the performance of military service, as determined by the Law. The following disciplinary measures are pronounced by competent military superiors: written reprimand, decreasing the amount of the monthly salary between 10% and 30% for a period of one to six months, and rank degradation and demotion to the previously held rank. The Chief of General Staff upon the proposal of the Military Disciplinary Commission determines disciplinary measures against professional soldiers, non-commissioned officers and officers up to a rank of a captain, and these measures are: prohibition for promotion to a higher rank for a period of one year, assignment to a duty at the previous rank for a period of two years; and deprivation from the rank. The same measures are pronounced by the Minister of Defence for personnel of the ranks from a major to colonel. The disciplinary measure of “termination of employment” to a civilian person in service of the armed forces is pronounced by the Chief of General Staff of the Armed Forces or by a person authorised by him/her, upon the proposal of the Military Disciplinary Commission. Military personnel are also financially liable. If military personnel negligently or deliberately cause damage to the property of the Republic of Macedonia related to the performance of duty, they are obliged to compensate for the damage, in a mode and procedure determined by the Law. A battalion commander, an equivalent or a higher military official for whom a rank of colonel or higher has been envisaged with the Formation Book, decides on financial liabilities and compensation, in a procedure determined by the Law. Termination of employment The termination of employment to a military official and professional soldier is undertaken if he/she: loses health or physical capability for service in the armed forces and does not have the general health capability for work as required; is discharged of citizenship of the Republic of Macedonia; has been assessed with the grade “unsatisfactory” two times consecutively for at least four assessment data; has not been promoted to a higher rank in three consecutive procedures; is absent from work due to serving a prison sentence (a military official for longer than two years and professional soldier for longer than six months); has been subject to a security or correctional measure due to which he/she is absent from work (a military official for longer than two years and professional soldier for longer than six months); files a personal request; and fulfils the requirement for retirement. Termination of employment to civilian persons in service of the Army is done in accordance with the general provisions on termination of employment pertaining to civil servants. The retirement of military personnel is done in accordance with the general provisions on retirement of workers in the Republic of Macedonia (age retirement with 64 years of age for men, i.e. 62 years of age for women, and 15 years of insurance). There is an exception to this rule that pertains to military personnel who have reduced years of insurance (for aviation services, parachutists, divers, members of special task units, performing radiological, biological and chemical protection, radar services, electronic surveillance, crypto-protection, security, intelligence and counter-intelligence, military police, and duties in a troop). This category of persons are entitled to an old age retirement with at least 25 years of insurance, of which at least 15 have been effectively spent in posts of reduced years of insurance, and 55 five years of age for men and 50 years of age for women, if their employment has been terminated due to service cuts. In the transitional period by 31 December 2007 some military personnel are to be prematurely retired as a result of the implementation of the rationalisation process in the Army, in accordance with a special law. Namely, the Ministry of Defence may buy an additional length of service of five years, and thus a military official or a civilian may acquire the right to old age retirement with 40 years of service for men and 35 years of service for women, regardless of age. Law on Internal Affairs In the structure of the Ministry of the Interior, there are three categories of employees with a different status:   Employees with special duties and authorities determined by the Law on Internal Affairs (police employees and operational employees, employees performing duties directly related to the police and operational duties, and the minister, his/her deputy, and managerial employees in charge of particular organisational units);   Civil servants, in accordance with the Law on Civil Servants;   Other employees who perform duties and tasks for the needs of the Ministry of the Interior, which fall under the competence of the Law on Labour Relations. Employment of workers with special duties and authorities The Ministry of the Interior recruits its personnel pursuant to the Law on Labour Relations, the Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 19/95, 55/97, 38/02, 33/03 and 19/04), as well as to the Collective Agreement of the Ministry. Pursuant to provisions in these laws and by-laws, any person who, apart from general conditions, fulfils the special conditions as determined by the Law on Internal Affairs may be employed in the Ministry of the Interior. The applicant should meet the following special conditions: to be a citizen of the Republic of Macedonia; to be of legal age; not to have been pronounced a security measure of prohibition to perform a profession or duty; to be physically and mentally fit for work; to be reputable and guarantee that he/she would conscientiously and honourably perform assigned duties and tasks; and if the person is male and he applies for a position with special duties and authorities, his military service must be fulfilled prior to employment. If a person applies for the position of a police officer, he/she must not be older than 25 years of age if he/she is being admitted to work for the first time. In addition, the person must have completed secondary school prior to applying. Pursuant to the Law on Internal Affairs, the Ministry may hire persons with or without a public announcement depending on the particularity and character of the position. They may be hired permanently or temporarily. An employment without a public announcement is offered for positions with special duties and authorities (determined by the Law on Internal Affairs and the Rulebook on Systematisation of Posts in the Ministry of the Interior), to scholarship beneficiaries of the Ministry and to graduates and students from the training institution established for the needs of the Ministry. In the course of employment there should be equitable representation of citizens belonging to all communities, with the respect of criteria on expertise and competence. The public announcement for employment, which is publicised in media, contains all general and special conditions for the advertised position. After receiving all employment applications, the Ministry conducts a concrete procedure through referring the persons to a specialised health examination and to security scrutiny by the Directorate for Security and Counter-Intelligence. The employment procedure is conducted by a Commission established by the minister. The Commission reviews all applications and shortlists candidates that meet the requirements. Following the procedure the minister brings a decision for appointment of candidates that have been admitted. Rights and duties The Law on Internal Affairs envisages special rights and duties for employees with special duties and authorities. They are responsible for the lawful application of means and methods in the line of duty. In the event of a state of emergency or war, employees of the Ministry are engaged in performing military and other duties for security and defence purposes as well as in relief efforts following natural disasters and epidemics. The employees of the Ministry of the Interior also assist in the enforcement of final court decisions if there is resistance in the course of arrest. They are obliged to obey the order of a superior, possess and carry a badge, weapons and ammunition and other prescribed equipment. The employees with special duties and authorities are obliged to carry out their tasks in every circumstance even if it poses risk to their life. In addition, they should provide assistance to citizens upon their request and provide information and refer citizens to other competent bodies and institutions. The rights of employees with special duties and authorities pursuant to the Law on Internal Affairs are the following: right to identifying and detaining citizens for the purpose of determining their identity; right to inspection of vehicles, persons and baggage and redirecting traffic while necessary; right to a free public transportation and to the same insurance covering all other passengers; right to a use of firearms and coercion means in cases determined by law; right to free legal assistance when subject to criminal, misdemeanour or civil proceedings due to a use of firearms, coercion means or other interventions as well as due to participation in a traffic accident or in line of duty. The Law determines issues regarding the working hours, leaves and other rights and obligations of employees in the Ministry (the obligation to keep state, official, military or business secrets; obligation not to perform an activity incompatible with their duties; right to insurance; rights in cases of death; restricted right to a strike and a right to a salary raise of 30%). The rights and duties as well as working hours, vacations and leaves have been set forth in detail in the Collective Agreement of the Ministry of the Interior. The by-laws regulating the conduct of authorised officers in carrying out duties and tasks are the Rules on the Mode of Conduct and Behaviour and Mutual Relations of Authorised Officers and the Rulebook on the Mode of Operation of the Ministry of the Interior.  In official relations with citizens, employees of the Ministry are obliged to be polite, reasonable, objective and correct, and respect the personality, dignity, rights and freedom of citizens, regardless of their gender or ethnic, religious, political affiliation and social status. They are also obliged to keep their reputation as well as the reputation of the Ministry and to continuously upgrade their knowledge, to improve their physical and mental steadiness and to adhere to the Police Code of Ethics. The employees must not accept gifts or other benefits from natural and legal persons in relation to their official duties; they may not perform activities that are incompatible with their duty; and they may not perform activities detrimental to the Ministry’s reputation. Employees with special duties and authorities apply special methods in carrying out their duties and are responsible for the legitimate application of such methods. The employees are obliged to carry personal weapons and equipment necessary for the execution of particular tasks in a mode determined by a regulation, and if they wear a uniform they are obliged to adhere to the provisions on wearing uniform and special equipment. Employees in the Ministry are not allowed to organise and act politically. They may not publicly express or represent stances of political parties or actively participate in their activities. Assignment The assignment of employees is carried out on the basis of provisions set forth in the Law on Labour Relations as well as the provisions in the Collective Agreement of the Ministry of the Interior. In the course of his/her employment with the Ministry the employee may be assigned to any post as determined by the act on systematisation of posts if such a post suits his/her level of education or professional training. An exception to this rule has been envisaged in the Collective Agreement, which stipulates that the employee may be assigned to a one level higher degree position than the degree he/she holds. The assignment of employees in the Ministry is carried out on the basis of: ) the employee’s request; b) upon the proposal of immediate superiors in organisational units; c) upon the proposal of the Director of the Public Security Bureau or the Director of the Directorate for Security and Counter-Intelligence. The head of the local unit of the Ministry is elected by the municipal councils covered by the unit from a list of at least three candidates proposed by the minister, of whom at least one should belong to the community of the majority population in the respective municipalities. The minister shall retain his/her authority for the dismissal of the local unit head in accordance with the Law. System of salaries and rewards Salaries and rewards have been regulated with the Collective Agreement of the Ministry of the Interior, the Rulebook on Salaries and the Rulebook on the Form and Mode of Awarding Rewards and Notes of Thanks and Merit. An employee may have his/her salary raised or reduced by 5%, 10% or 15% proportionately to the duties and assignments and his/her contribution to the total operation of the organisational entity and the Ministry as a whole. The procedure for determining a raised or reduced amount of salary is conducted every month upon the proposal of the head of organisational entity and following consent from a superior. Employees are awarded rewards, acknowledgements and notes of merit for special successes and results in their work and contribution to the operations of the Ministry. These rewards are awarded on the Police Day, other solemn occasions and upon retirement. Professional training and development Pursuant to the provisions in the Collective Agreement, the Ministry of Internal Affairs may hire an unemployed person as an intern with at least a level IV of professional training (secondary school). The person may be hired permanently or temporarily. The intern is trained for an independent and professional performance of tasks and duties required from the position. The internship cannot be shorter than 6 months or longer than 12 months. The intern is professionally trained during the internship in accordance with a prior plan. The professional training is carried out through the assignment of duties and tasks, learning, consultations, and guidelines and instructions by superiors in organisational units. Following the professional training the intern takes an exam upon his/her prior request. The exam is oral and is taken in two consecutive days before the Commission (with a two-year mandate) established by the minister's Decision. The intern who does not pass a part or the whole exam has a right to re-examination after 15 days have elapsed from the first one. An intern who has not applied for examination within 12 months due to unjustifiable reasons is dismissed. The intern who has passed the exam is given a certificate of completion. A person employed to a position with special duties and authorities who does not have the required education in the field of security, is referred to additional professional training in an adequate institution. Professional training and development of employees is carried out through conferences, courses, and additional studies in the country or abroad. Additional professional training for police officers is undertaken pursuant to a programme adopted by the minister. Seminars and courses are held for different categories of employees depending on the nature and complexity of their positions. When certain tasks necessitate a higher level of expertise the employee may be directed to expert specialisation in the country or abroad. The employee with a higher education (level VII) may be sent to post-graduate studies as a form of professional training for the purpose of better performance of duties and tasks. An employee assigned to a position requiring knowledge of a foreign language may be referred to additional training in that particular language. Given the specificity of competencies, the Ministry creates highly educated cadres in the Police Academy as a state institution in the field of security. The basic training of police officers, specific trainings as well as training for security management is also carried out in the Academy. Continued education is carried out on the basis of programmes adopted by the minister of the Interior. The elementary police education is a 12-month academic programme, of which practical field training takes three months, while the length of special and management courses depends on their programmes, but may not be longer than 12 months. Following the completion of training, the trainees are awarded a certificate of completion of basic training or special training certificate. The Ministry continuously trains its employees with a determined dynamics. Namely, from 2001 to 2004, 1.605 employees underwent to basic training at the Police Academy, of which 239 Macedonians, 1.145 Albanians, 81 Turks, 58 Roma, 32 Serbs and 50 - of other ethnicity. Until September 2004, a total of 127 persons underwent special training at the Police Academy, of which 22 Macedonians, 90 members of the Albanian ethnic community and 15 members of other communities in Macedonia. Following the amendments to the Law on Internal Affairs and the Law on Crossing the State Border and Movement in the Border Zone, prerequisites were created for a border police as a special organisational entity within the Ministry. The transfer of competences related to securing the state border and the movement in the border zone provided for a contractual taking over of 821 persons who had previously undergone special three-month training in the Police Academy. Liability The procedure on determining liability due to violation of the working discipline is initiated upon a proposal of either the Director of the Public Security Bureau, the Director of the Directorate for Security and Counter-Intelligence, undersecretaries or of employees authorised by the minister. The proposal with all relevant evidence is submitted to the Dismissal Commission, which is established by the minister. After completing the procedure, the Commission, pursuant to provisions from the Collective Agreement, submits a proposal to the minister for adequate actions. The minister adopts a decision for termination of employment if he/she agrees with the proposal submitted by the Commission. If the minister disagrees he/she may return the subject to a review for correction of irregularities or he/she may bring a different decision. If there are circumstances as envisaged by the Collective Agreement of the Ministry, the dismissal may be replaced with a fine not higher than 15% of the monthly salary for a period of one to six months. The employee has a right to appeal against the decision of the minister to the second-instance commission within the Government in charge of labour relations. An employee who, by his/her fault causes damage to the Ministry in the course of his/her duty shall be subject to a procedure for indemnity. The procedure is initiated upon a request that may be submitted by the director of the Public Security Bureau, the director of the Directorate for Security and Counter-Intelligence, by managerial employees or by heads of a respective organisational unit. The request is submitted to the Commission for Determining Financial Liability established by the minister with a Decision. The Commission conducts a procedure pursuant to provisions in the Collective Agreement and adopts a decision. The decision is then sent to the employee who has a right to appeal to the minister. If the employee has been found responsible and if he/she does not compensate for the damages, the Ministry may initiate a procedure before the court after the expiry of the three-month deadline from the time the decision has been effective. Termination of employment An employee in the Ministry may be subject to termination of employment in the following cases:   If he/she contractually agrees with his/her employer for the termination of employment;   If the time for which he/she has been assigned to the temporary position expires;    By the force of law, i.e.: when the ability to work has been lost; if the court has prohibited him/her perform tasks and duties; if serving a prison sentence longer than six months; if a security, correctional or protection measure has been pronounced for longer than six months; if he/she fulfils the requirement for accelerated retirement plan in accordance with the Law on Pension and Disability Insurance; as well as if he/she declares in writing that he/she wants to terminate employment;   By a dismissal notice from the employer if the employee is not capable of performing duties and tasks as required with the position or if he/she violates the working discipline or order. 
Customs Administration The Law on Customs Administration (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 46/04), regulates the particularities in the rights, responsibilities and liabilities of customs officers deriving from the employment, the Code of Conduct, the awards and acknowledgements, as well as the financing of the Customs Administration. Customs officer means an officer of the Customs Administration who is uniformed or has special duties and authorities. The Law has envisaged 26 different positions divided in three categories of customs officers.   Managerial customs officers are: Assistant Director; Customs House Manager; Assistant Customs House Manager; Chief of Department; Head of Customs Office; Head of Unit; Section Leader; and Shift Leader.   Expert customs officers are: Advisor of the Director; Chief Inspector; Independent Advisor; Senior Customs Worker Controller; Senior Inspector; System Engineer; Inspector; Senior Customs Worker; Advisor; Junior Inspector; Customs Worker; Dog Handler.   Administrative customs officers are: Chief Network Operator; Network Operator; Operator; Administrative Operator; Technician for Support and Coordination; and Customs Goods Sales Officer. With regard to required education as one of the conditions for employment, the Law on Customs Administration prescribes that customs officers in the first group must have higher or post-secondary education, except for the shift leader who may have higher, post-secondary or secondary education. The customs officers in the second and third groups may also have higher, post-secondary or secondary education. Customs officers fall under the competence of the Law on Labour Relations and the provisions related to health, pension and disability insurance, as well as the Collective Agreement of the Customs Administration regarding issues not specifically regulated by the Law on Customs Administration. Provisions in the Law on Labour Relations are also applied to the technical and assistance personnel employed in the Customs Administration. Employment of customs officers Any person may be employed in the Customs Administration as a customs officer who, apart from the general conditions, fulfils the special conditions as prescribed by the act on systematisation of posts in the Customs Administration. The Custom administration applies the principle of equitable representation in the course of employment of customs officers. The employment procedure is carried out through a public vacancy announcement publicised in at least two daily newspapers of which one in the language spoken by at least 20% of the citizens who speak a language other than Macedonian. There are two exceptions to the rule: The first is that a customs officer may be transferred from one into another state body without a public announcement of the vacancy if the needs of the Customs Administration thus require; and the second is that the Director reserves the right to grant permission to waive the publication of a public vacancy announcement on the basis of his/her decision for promotion or transfer of a customs officer to the vacant post. The Director makes a decision on the final selection of the applicants. The employment is established by concluding a written employment contract between the chosen candidate and the Director. Regulations on the examination of work capabilities and the procedures for commencing employment is determined under the Collective Agreement or under operational instructions brought by the Director. The Law also envisages probationary period upon concluding an employment contracts or upon promoting customs officers. Thus a newly employed or a promoted customs officer is required to serve a probationary period of 6 to 12 months. The Customs Administration provides vocational training to all employees for the performance of their tasks. In the course of probationary period the customs officers are placed under the care and direct supervision and assessment of their immediate superior. At the end of the probationary period a decision is taken whether to confirm the appointment or terminate the employment. As an exception, the decision for termination of employment may also be brought before the expiration of the probation period, if it is determined that the customs officer does not meet the requirements of the post. In case of promoted customs officers who do not perform satisfactorily during the probation period, a decision shall be taken to return them to their previous position. Rights and duties of customs officers One of the fundamental principles in the performance of customs officers is the principle of non-discrimination. The law explicitly stipulates that the Customs Administration and the customs officers shall not discriminate against any person on any ground, such as: gender, race, skin colour, ethnic or social origin, political and religious affiliation, property and social status or other status. Furthermore, the Law regulates the following fundamental rights of the customs officer: the right to guaranteed work in accordance with the Law; the right to protection from competent authorities in the performance of his/her tasks; the right to adequate working conditions for the performance of official duties; the right to apply for a higher position; the right to seek court protection in exercising his/her rights, or protection from other competent authority or trade union; the right to salary and allowances; the right to vacation, leaves, and absences; the right to professional development and training; the right to additional work out of the working hours if such work is not incompatible with his/her official duties and activities; and the right to found and be a member of a trade union or professional organisations. Due to specifics of the duties they carry out, customs officers have a right to a safe and healthy environment free of dangers to life or body; however, they also are required to adhere to the prescribed measures and norms regarding protection at work. The Law on Customs Administration prescribes that the customs officers are obliged to carry out their duties conscientiously, professionally, efficiently, orderly and timely, in accordance with the Constitution and law and other regulations in customs administration. Furthermore, the customs officer is obliged to perform his or her activities impartially and without the influence of political parties; he/she may not be guided by his or her own political beliefs or personal financial interests; he/she is required to execute orders of the immediate superior; he/she must not accept financial or other benefits in the line of duty; he/she is required to attend professional training and development; he/she must handle equipment with care and respect the order and discipline of the institution.  The customs officers are subject to special provisions regarding the prevention of conflict of interests. The customs officers may not perform any other profit making function, duty or activity, which is in conflict with their official duty. In addition, the customs officers may not conduct an activity in conflict with their official duty as owners or partners in companies, members of a board of directors or of supervisory authorities of trade companies. The Director defines activities in conflict of the customs officer’s duties. The customs officers may undertake other work and perform other activities only after prior approval by the Director. The protection of documents and data defined as official, business or any other secret has been determined as a duty of the customs officers even after the termination of employment until the restricted period of confidentiality ceases. In addition, the customs officer must not use or communicate for unauthorised purposes any information to his/her knowledge pertaining to customs matters. Reassignment and promotion of customs officers In the interest of the Customs Administration, the customs officer may, for a specified or unspecified period, be reassigned to another post that corresponds to his/her professional background, knowledge and qualifications. When the customs officer is being reassigned for a specified period (which may last up to 6 months with a possibility for another 6-month extension) he/she is obliged to return to the previous or equivalent post after the expiry of reassignment. The customs officer who has been reassigned is entitled to compensation of expenses unless he/she has been reassigned upon his/her own request. In the course of reassignment the Director has a right not to put out a public vacancy announcement. The Director is entitled to the same right in the course of promoting customs officers. Both the reassignments and promotions may be permanent and temporary. The customs officer may be permanently reassigned (promoted) to another higher position for which an internal vacancy announcement is made, hence only employees may apply. The temporary promotion means that a customs officer is placed to a higher position for a certain period of time. After the expiry of the period the customs officer is returned to his/her permanent position or other adequate post. Monthly Salary, Allowances, Rewards and Bonuses Customs officers are entitled to monthly salaries, salary allowances and other allowances. They receive 30% of the salary in addition to the regular salary for special work conditions, as well as for special responsibility resulting from the post. The amount for specific posts demanding more specific qualifications or specific skills, and which are of particular significance to the efficiency of the Customs Administration, may be higher but cannot exceed 50% of the salary. Customs officers receive rewards as a result of the assessment of their performance, particular outstanding performance or detection of customs-related crimes or offences. Assessment of customs officers The assessment of the customs officers is made on the basis of data regarding the professional knowledge and skills of the post, the efforts, the results achieved, and the creativity and conscientiousness in the performance of official duties. The customs officers are assessed once a year, but not later than the first quarter of the subsequent year for the year that has expired. Performance evaluation and assessment of a customs officer may also be conducted prior to the annual evaluation assessment whenever the needs demand a decision regarding unsatisfactory work results, reassignment, promotion and disciplinary measures. Customs officers who do not achieve satisfactory results in their performance are directed to additional training and support from their superiors. If they do not achieve a satisfactory result within a period of time, a procedure for termination of employment follows. Professional development and training of customs officers Customs officers have a right and duty to professional development and training in accordance with the needs of the Customs Administration. The Customs Administration provides all customs officers professional training for the performance of tasks in the new position. The training is not only provided to the newly employed customs officer, but also to those promoted. In addition, the customs officer who does not perform satisfactorily is entitled to a support from the immediate superior and additional training for a certain period of time in order to achieve the desired and satisfactory results in performance. Liabilities of customs officers  The Law on Customs Administration envisages disciplinary and financial liability of customs officers. In addition, they may be subject to misdemeanour and criminal proceedings in accordance with the law. The customs officers are disciplinary liable for the non-fulfilment of the official duties and functions, failure to comply with the general obligations stipulated in this Law, unsatisfactory performance results and lack of knowledge and ability for the performance of the functions of the post, as well as for violation of the Code of Conduct. The customs officer who intentionally or due to complete negligence causes damage by acting contrary to the law and other regulation is disciplinarily liable. The determination of disciplinary liability, procedures, punishments and protection in the course of procedure is determined in accordance with general and special provisions on labour relations and the collective agreement. A disciplinary measure is pronounced by a decision of the Director. Notwithstanding the disciplinary liability, the customs officer may also be financially liable for the damage he/she has caused to the property used by the Customs Administration. Termination of employment The Law on Customs Administration stipulates the cases when the employment is terminated. The termination of employment of a customs officer occurs in the following cases:   Upon his/her request;   If he/she permanently loses his/her physical and mental ability to perform his/her functions in the Customs Administration as a consequence of a medical condition or diminution of his/her physical or mental capabilities;   Due to failure to comply with the particular requirements;   Due to a disciplinary measure of termination of employment;   If due to the serving of a prison sentence, he/she must be absent from work for a period longer than six months;   If he/she fulfils the requirements for retirement in accordance with law;   If the post of the customs officer is terminated due to organisational changes, reduction of powers and scope of work of the Customs Administration, and the customs officer refuses to be reallocated at the same or lower position;   If it is determined through the assessment based on an assessment system that he/she does not meet the standards and requirements of the post; and   If the customs officer unsatisfactorily fulfils his/her duties or has no skills for performing his/her function based on an assessment by official application of the assessment system. Intelligence Agency The employees of the Intelligence Agency exercise their rights, duties and responsibilities in accordance with provisions from the Law on the Intelligence Agency (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 19/95), and the Law on Labour Relations. The rights to pension and disability insurance as determined by the Law on Pension and Disability Insurance (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 80/93,3/94, 14/95, 71/96, 32/97, 49/97, 24/00, 96/00, 13/01, 50/01, 85/03, 50/04 and 4/05), are adequately applied to the employees in the Agency. The act on systematisation of posts in the Agency determines posts that require special duties and authorities (special posts). Employment and termination of employment All employments, including those for special posts, require special conditions notwithstanding the general conditions. The special conditions are: the applicant must not have been subject to effective security measure of prohibition of performing a profession, activity or duty and must be mentally and physically healthy.  Recruitments in the Agency are realised through a publication of a vacancy announcement; however, the Law prescribes that an announcement may not be necessary for special posts. An employee convicted of a crime against the constitutional order and security of the Republic of Macedonia; against freedoms and rights of the citizen and the individual; against the economy; against the Armed Forces of the Republic of Macedonia; severe crimes against life and body or property; or a crime perpetrated for self-interest or out of dishonest motives punishable ex officio, is dismissed. Employment is also terminated if an employee has been subject to security measure of prohibition to perform a profession, activity or duty. Employment shall be terminated if an employee who has been reassigned to other duty does not appear to the post within seven days from the receipt of the reassignment decision. Finally, employment is terminated if the employee has been dismissed. Rights and obligations Taking into account the Agency’s authorities to gather data and information of importance to the security and defence of the Republic of Macedonia as well as of importance to the economic, political and other interests of the state, the Law prescribes that the employees are obliged to respects citizens freedoms and rights as guaranteed by the Constitution while performing their duties and using information. They are also obliged to secure the protection of confidentiality of data and disposable information. The working hours of employees in the Agency may be longer than the maximum time prescribed by law when certain duties and tasks cannot be delayed. In such circumstances the employee's vacation or leave may be delayed or terminated. The employees may also be prohibited to travel abroad when the security and defence of the Republic of Macedonia necessitate such action. Additionally, every employee employed in a special post may travel abroad only upon his/her immediate superior's consent. The Agency is obliged to insure employees in special posts in case of death, bodily injury or loss of ability to work. These employees are entitled to compensation in the amount of the monthly salary in case they have been temporarily disabled to work as a result of performing tasks and duties at work. Salary funds for such employees are raised for 30%. One of the basic duties of employees is to protect the state, official, military or business secret that they have acquired in the line of duty. This obligation continues after the termination of employment, and a decision for a release of such obligation may only be brought by the Director. Employees in the Agency may not perform a profession, duty or function that is incompatible with their duties. Liability The Law stipulates the following cases of violation of working discipline:   Acting against the rules and regulations of the Agency;   Not giving or giving incorrect data and information to authorised bodies;   Avoiding the mandatory professional training and development;   Avoiding medical examination for determining the ability to work;   Illegal gains as a result of activities related to duties and tasks;   Use or enabling another to use money or valuables that have been entrusted to the him/her in the line of duty;   Performance of duties, professions or functions incompatible with the employee's duties;   Carrying out, expressing or representing positions of political parties in the line of duty;   Committing a crime which pursuant to the Law is an obstacle for employment or committing an act that constitutes a severer form of misdemeanour against public order and peace. If the employee commits a severer violation of the working discipline, he/she may be suspended from the Agency or may receive a dismissal notice. Professional training and development A person signing an employment contract or a person assigned to a position requiring training is referred to professional training and development in adequate organisations in the field of education or other forms of professional training. Assignment The Director makes the assignments and the employee may be assigned to any organisational entity to a position that suits his/her educational background. If the employee is assigned to a position out of the Agency’s seat, the decision for reassignment is reviewed every year and in such cases the employee is entitled to special allowances. An employee at a special post, who has been assessed by the Health Commission as unfit for performing special duties and authorities due to a diminution in mental and physical capabilities, is assigned to a post that suits his/her level of education and health condition. In such cases the employee retains all rights deriving from the employment in the position he had been assigned previously. Other civil servants not subject to the Law on Civil Servants Court police Court police personnel are employed pursuant to the Law on Courts (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 36/95, 45/95 and 44/03). The Ministry of Justice announces a public vacancy and the selection is made by the Minister of Justice. Forest police The employments in the forest police are regulated by general provisions in the labour legislation. The Law on Forests (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 47/97 and 7/00), regulates the special employment conditions, wearing a uniform, authorities of the forest police officers and the modes of keeping and use of firearms.  Financial police. The Law on Financial Police (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 55/02), regulates the following status, rights and obligations of financial police officers: employment (they are appointed by the Minister of Finance upon the proposal of the Director of the Financial Police if they meet the special employment requirements); right to a salary raised up to 30% and a right to an accelerated retirement plan pursuant to the regulations in pension and disability insurance; the right to a daily, weekly or annual leave pursuant to provisions in general labour legislation; the protection of a state, official and business secret; wearing an official uniform and authorisation badge; and the use of firearms. Penitentiary and correctional Institutions Personnel in penitentiary and correctional institutions are employed pursuant to the provisions in the Law on Labour Relations and the Law on Execution of Sanctions (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 3/97, 23/99 and 74/04). The procedure is performed in accordance with the Law on Labour Relations, while the Law on Execution of Sanctions determines the special conditions for selected posts. State Audit Office With regard to the employment, rights, duties and other questions pertaining to the status of the authorised state auditors and persons performing duties and tasks related to state audit at the State Audit Office (for more details see 28_I_A_1). Civil Aviation Authority Employees of the Civil Aviation Authority performing aviation tasks and duties of importance to the aviation security are subject to provisions of the Law on Aviation and the Law on Labour Relations. Personnel in the Civil Aviation Authority are employed pursuant to the Law on Labour Relations, and the rights and duties of the employees have been determined by the Law on Aviation which stipulates that employees must acquire licenses and meet adequate health criteria, depending on their license or authorisation. The employees receive salaries in accordance with the Decision on the Mode and Procedure for Determining Salaries of Employees at the Civil Aviation Authority, adopted by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia. Public servants The status, rights and duties of employees in public institutions in the sectors of social and child care, health, culture, education and science; employees in the public funds (Pension and Disability Insurance Fund, Health Fund, Roads Fund); employees in the Employment Agency and other public services and institutions that carry out state functions delegated to them as public authorities, are referred to as public servants and they are subject to the general provisions in labour relations. In accordance with the Law on Labour Relations  (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 80/93, 3/94, 14/95, 53/97, 59/97, 21/98, 25/00, 34/00, 50,01, 25/03 40/03 and 80/03 - consolidated text), employment in a public institution or other legal entity that has been vested with public mandate must be done in accordance with the principle of equitable representation of all communities, without prejudice to the criteria on expertise and competence. In addition, a vacancy is announced in at least two daily newspapers of which one should be in the language spoken by at least 20% of the citizens who speak an official language other than Macedonian. Some issues pertaining to the structure of positions as well as the conditions and procedure for acquiring such positions have been determined in special material laws regulating the operations of public institutions in certain fields. The salaries and other allowances of public servants are paid pursuant to provisions in the Law on Payment of Salaries (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 70/94, 62/95, 33/97, 50/01, 26/02 and 46/02), collective agreements and the acts adopted by the public institution. The institutions with the assistance from foreign donors and international organisations have organised professional training and development of public servants in various sectors.  For instance, the public institution for the study of social affairs and problems and for the promotion of social activities (the Institute for Social Affairs in Skopje) is also authorised to perform training of expert public servants. This institute also prepares instructions and manuals and uses them in seminars on the introduction of contemporary methods for the treatment of social pathology. In recent years there have been approximately 500 participants in such seminars. The funding of training has been supported from the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia and foreign donors, including the PHARE Programme. In addition, the Institute for Social Work and Social Policy within the Faculty of Philosophy, of the University “Ss. Cyril and Methodius”, - Skopje, has organised more than 50 trainings for over 1200 participants from the whole country within the framework of the multi-annual project for the promotion of the potential of social development. The Pension and Disability Fund has carried out training for 200 employees in the last three years focused on computer literacy (MS Windows, MS Office and the Internet). In the course of 2002 and 2003, special training was organised for 15 programmers of ORACLE, for seven system engineers and for four MS Project managers. In the fields of education and science within the EU Tempus Programme there have been projects for the establishment of infrastructure within the framework of higher education institutions for the purpose of continuous education and training of civil and public servants, as well as for the private sector. Hence, a Training Centre for European Integration, Training Centre for Industrial Property, and a Centre for the Assessment of Pressure Vessels have been established. Gender and Ethnic Structure of Public Servants  The structure of the employees in the public administration in the Republic of Macedonia in December 2004 is the following:  ETHNICITY  
GENDER 